Lecture6/fin_cons_grad.twolc
! GRADATION.TXT -- a set of rules for Finnish consonant gradation
! Copyright (c) 1987 by Lauri Karttunen, modified by Mathias Creutz

Alphabet

   a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v x y ä ö w z #:0 ;

Sets

   VclessStop = k p t ;
   Cons = VclessStop b c d f g h j l m n ng r s v x z ' ;
   Vowel = a e i o u y ä ö ;
   Labial =  p b m ;
   Velar = g k ;
   Liquid = l r ;
   Nasal = m n ;
   HighLabial = u y ;

Definitions

   ClosedOffset = :Cons #: ;

Rules

   "Consonant gradation" ! Single k, p, and t are realized as
                         ! zero, v, and d, respectively, in the
                         ! beginning of a closed syllable.
     Cx:Cy <=>  h | Liquid | Vowel: _ Vowel ClosedOffset ;
     	                 where Cx in (k p t)
           		             Cy in (0 v d)
                      matched ;

   "Geminate gradation"           ! Geminate stops are shortened to
                                  ! single stops in a closed syllable.

     Cx:0 <=>  Cx _ Vowel ClosedOffset ;
               where Cx in VclessStop ;


  "Gradation after nasals"  ! Stops assimilate to the preceding
                            ! nasal consonant in the weak grade.

     Cx:Cy <=> Cz _ Vowel ClosedOffset ;
               where Cx in (k p t)
                     Cy in (g m n)
                     Cz in (n m n)
               matched ;
 
  "Gradation of k after VV"   ! k weakens to a syllable boundary
                              ! marker between a pair of identical
                              ! vowels following another vowel

     k:' <=> Vowel Vx _ Vx ClosedOffset ; where Vx in Vowel ;

 
  "Gradation of k between u/y"   ! k weakens to v between u's
                                 ! and y's.

     k:v <=> Cons Vx _ Vx ClosedOffset ;
             where Vx in HighLabial ;

  "Gradation of k after liquids or h"   ! k weakens to j before e
                                        ! after a liquid or h.

     k:j <=> Liquid | h _ e: ClosedOffset ;

  "Gradation of t after liquids"   ! t assimilates to the preceding
                                   ! liquid in the weak grade.

     t:Cx  <=>  Cx _ Vowel ClosedOffset  ; where Cx in Liquid ;

  "Weak grade of poika, aika"   ! Exceptionally, poja.., aja..
                                ! instead of *poia.., *aia.. in the
                                ! weak grade of poika, aika.

     i:j <=> #: [p o | a ] _ k: a: ClosedOffset ;


  "Weak grade of ruoka"   ! Exceptionally, either ruoa.. or ruua..
                          ! in the weak grade of ruoka.
                          ! The operator is => rather than <=> because
                          ! o can also be realized as itself here.

     o:u => #: r u _ k: a: ClosedOffset ;
